Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 11
FILING DOCUMENTS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1997, and this part 11 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 11 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

7-64-1101. Filing requirements.

Part 3 of article 90 of this title, providing for the filing of documents, applies to any document filed or to be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2258, § 167, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-1102. Registered agent - service of process. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2259, § 167, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1454, § 166, effective July 1.